src/morphology/affixes/pronouns.lexc
LEXICON PRON-DUAL
+Pron+Du: PRON-NEG-OBL ;

! LEXICON PRON-INTER-REL-HUM-COLL
! +Coll:нан PRON-INTER-REL-HUM-COLL-PERS ;
! +ZeroColl: PRON-INTER-REL-HUM-COLL-PERS ;
! +ZeroColl+PxPl2+Acc2:ныдтӧ PRON-INTER-REL-HUM-COLL-INDEF ;
! +Coll+Acc2+PxPl2:наннытӧ PRON-INTER-REL-HUM-COLL-INDEF ;
! 
! LEXICON PRON-INTER-REL-HUM-COLL-PERS
! +PxPl1:ным PRON-INTER-REL-HUM-COLL-CASES ;
! +PxPl2:ныд PRON-INTER-REL-HUM-COLL-CASES ;
! +PxPl3:ныс PRON-INTER-REL-HUM-COLL-CASES ;
! +Acc+PxPl1:нымӧс PRON-INTER-REL-HUM-COLL-INDEF ;
! +Acc3+PxPl3:ныссӧ PRON-INTER-REL-HUM-COLL-INDEF ;
! 
! LEXICON PRON-INTER-REL-HUM-COLL-CASES
! +Nom: PRON-INTER-REL-HUM-COLL-INDEF ;
! +Gen:лӧн PRON-INTER-REL-HUM-COLL-INDEF ;
! +Abl:лысь PRON-INTER-REL-HUM-COLL-INDEF ;
! +Dat:лы PRON-INTER-REL-HUM-COLL-INDEF ;
! +Ins:ӧн PRON-INTER-REL-HUM-COLL-INDEF ;
! +Com:кӧд PRON-INTER-REL-HUM-COLL-INDEF ;
! +Car:тӧг PRON-INTER-REL-HUM-COLL-INDEF ;
! +Cns:ла PRON-INTER-REL-HUM-COLL-INDEF ;
! +Ine:ын PRON-INTER-REL-HUM-COLL-INDEF ;
! +Ela:ысь PRON-INTER-REL-HUM-COLL-INDEF ;
! +Ill:ӧ PRON-INTER-REL-HUM-COLL-INDEF ;
! +Apr:лань PRON-INTER-REL-HUM-COLL-INDEF ;
! +Egr:сянь PRON-INTER-REL-HUM-COLL-INDEF ;
! +Tra:ті PRON-INTER-REL-HUM-COLL-INDEF ;
! +Ter:ӧдз PRON-INTER-REL-HUM-COLL-INDEF ;
! 
! LEXICON PRON-INTER-REL-HUM-COLL-INDEF
! +Der/кӧ+Indef:кӧ K ;
!  K ;

!Actually there might be reason to consider +Der/MWN
LEXICON PRONQ-MUKOD
!2017-09-20+Pron+Abs: WordEnd ;
+Pron+Sg+Nom: K ;
+Pron+Sg: PRONQ-STAV-CASES ;
+Pron+Pl+Nom:ъяс K ;
+Pron+Pl:ъяс PRONQ-STAV-CASES ;

LEXICON PRONQ-STAV
!2017-09-20+Pron+Abs: WordEnd ;
+Pron+Sg+Nom: K ;
+Pron+Sg+ZeroAcc: K ;
+Pron+Sg: PRONQ-STAV-CASES ;

LEXICON PRONQ-STAV-CASES
+Nom+PxSg2:ыд K ;
+Nom+PxSg3:ыс K ;
+Nom+PxPl1:ным K ;
+Nom+PxPl2:ныд K ;
+Nom+PxPl3:ныс K ;

+Ins:ӧн K ;
+Ins+PxSg1:нам K ;
+Ins+PxSg2:над K ;
+Ins+PxSg3:нас K ;
+Ins+PxPl1:нымӧн K ; ! Should there be a Der/ӧн tag?
+Ins+PxPl2:ныдӧн K ; ! Should there be a Der/ӧн tag?
+Ins+PxPl3:нысӧн K ; ! Should there be a Der/ӧн tag?

+Ela:ысь K ;
+Ela+PxSg3:сьыс K ;
+Ela+PxPl1:сьыным K ;
+Ela+PxPl1:нымысь K ;
+Ela+PxPl2:сьыныд K ;
+Ela+PxPl2:ныдысь K ;
+Ela+PxPl3:сьыныс K ;
+Ela+PxPl3:нысысь K ;

+Gen:лӧн K ;
+Gen+PxSg3:ыслӧн K ;
+Gen+PxPl1:нымлӧн K ;
+Gen+PxPl2:ныдлӧн K ;
+Gen+PxPl3:ныслӧн K ;

+Acc:ӧс K ;
+Acc+PxSg1:ӧс K ;
+Acc2+PxSg2:тӧ K ;
+Acc3+PxSg3:сӧ K ;
+Acc+PxPl1:нымӧс K ;
+Acc2+PxPl2:нытӧ K ;
+Acc3+PxPl3:нысӧ K ;

+Dat+PxSg2:ыдлы K ; ! This far 2017-03-19
+Dat+PxSg3:ыслы K ;
+Dat+PxPl1:нымлы K ;
+Dat+PxPl2:ныдлы K ;
+Dat+PxPl3:ныслы K ;

+Abl:лысь K ;
+Abl+PxSg3:ыслысь K ;
+Abl+PxPl1:нымлысь K ;
+Abl+PxPl2:ныдлысь K ;
+Abl+PxPl3:ныслысь K ;

+Com:кӧд K ;
+Com+PxSg3:ыскӧд K ;
+Com+Com+PxPl1:нымкӧд K ;
+Com+PxPl2:ныдкӧд K ;
+Com+PxPl3:ныскӧд K ;

+Car:тӧг K ;
+Car+PxSg3:ыстӧг K ;
+Car+PxPl1:нымтӧг K ;
+Car+PxPl2:ныдтӧг K ;
+Car+PxPl3:ныстӧг K ;

+Cns:ла K ;
+Cns+PxSg3:ысла K ;
+Cns+PxPl1:нымла K ;
+Cns+PxPl2:ныдла K ;
+Cns+PxPl3:нысла K ;

+Cmpr+PxSg3:сяыс K ;

+Ine:ын K ;
+Ine+PxPl1:нымын K ;
+Ine+PxPl2:ныдын K ;
+Ine+PxPl3:нысын K ;

+Ill:ӧ K ;
+Ill+PxPl1:нымӧ K ;
+Ill+PxPl2:ныдӧ K ;
+Ill+PxPl3:нысӧ K ;

+Egr:сянь K ;
+Egr+PxSg3:сяньыс K ;
+Egr+PxSg3:ыссянь K ;
+Egr+PxPl1:сяньным K ;
+Egr+PxPl1:нымсянь K ;
+Egr+PxPl2:сяньныд K ;
+Egr+PxPl2:ныдсянь K ;
+Egr+PxPl3:ныссянь K ;

+Apr:лань K ;
+Apr+PxSg3:ланьыс K ;
+Apr+PxSg3:ыслань K ;
+Apr+PxPl1:нымлань K ;
+Apr+PxPl2:ныдлань K ;
+Apr+PxPl3:ныслань K ;

+Tra:ті K ;
+Tra+PxSg3:тіыс K ;
+Tra+PxSg3:ысті K ;
+Tra+PxPl1:нымті K ;
+Tra+PxPl2:ныдті K ;
+Tra+PxPl3:нысті K ;

+Ter:ӧдз K ;
+Ter+PxSg3:ысӧдз K ;
+Ter+PxPl1:нымӧдз K ;
+Ter+PxPl2:ныдӧдз K ;
+Ter+PxPl3:нысӧдз K ;



! COMPARATIVE ; ! sg/pl?

LEXICON PRONQ-COLL
+Pron+Coll+Sg: PRONQ-COLL-CASE ; ! sg/pl?

! быдӧн, ӧтнасӧн, ӧтнамӧн, ӧтнадӧн, ставӧн, кымынӧн, унаӧн, кыкӧн

LEXICON PRONQ-COLL-CASE
!ӧнія коми кыв 2000: 183
+Nom: K ;
+Gen:лӧн K ;
+Gen+PxSg2:ыдлӧн K ;
+Gen+PxSg3:ыслӧн K ;
+Abl:лысь K ;
+Abl+PxSg2:ыдлысь K ;
+Abl+PxSg3:ыслысь K ;
+Dat:лы K ;
+Dat+PxSg2:ыдлысь K ;
+Dat+PxSg3:ыслысь K ;
+Acc:ӧс K ;
+Acc2+PxSg2:тӧ K ;
+Acc3+PxSg3:сӧ K ;
+Ins:ӧн K ;
+Com:кӧд K ;
+Com+PxSg2:ыдкӧд K ;
+Com+PxSg3:ыскӧд K ;
+Car:тӧг K ;
+Car+PxSg2:тӧгыд K ;
+Car+PxSg3:тӧгыс K ;
+Cns:ла K ;
+Cns+PxSg2:ыдла K ;
+Cns+PxSg3:ысла K ;
+Ine:ын K ;
+Ela:ысь K ;
+Ela+PxSg2:сьыд K ;
+Ela+PxSg3:сьыс K ;
+Ill:ӧ K ;
+Apr:лань K ;
+Apr+PxSg2:ланьыд K ;
+Apr+PxSg3:ланьыс K ;
+Egr:сянь K ;
+Egr+PxSg2:сяньыд K ;
+Egr+PxSg3:сяньыс K ;
+Tra:ті K ;
+Ter:ӧдз K ;
+Ter+PxSg2:ӧдзыд K ;
+Ter+PxSg3:ӧдзыс K ;

LEXICON PRONQ-ATAG
+Pron+Qnt+A: K ;
+Pron+Qnt+A+Der/MWN: Noun1 ;

LEXICON PRON-QNT_
+Pron+Qnt: COMPARATIVE ; ! sg/pl?

!2018-10-21!LEXICON PRON-QNT_-PL
!2018-10-21!+Pron+Qnt+Pl: WordEnd ;

LEXICON PRON-QNT-IS_ILL
+Pron+Qnt+Ill: K ;


LEXICON PRON-NEG-End
+Pron+Neg: K ;

LEXICON PRON-NEG-A
+Pron+Der+Neg+A: WordEnd ;
+Pron+Der+Neg+A+Sg+Nom: WordEnd ;
+Pron+Der+Neg+A+Sg: PRON-NEG-OBL ;
!+Pron+Neg+A+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Nom: WordEnd ;
!+Pron+Neg+A+Der/MWN+N+Sg: PRON-NEG-OBL ;

LEXICON PRON-NEG-ADV
+Pron+Der+Neg+Adv: COMPARATIVE ;

LEXICON PRON-NEG-IN_LA
+Pron+Neg+Der/ла+Spat: PRON-NEG-SPAT ;

LEXICON PRON-NEG-ITER
+Pron+Der+Neg+Der/ысь+Adv: K ; !+Iter

LEXICON PRON-NEG
+Pron+Neg+Sg: PRON-NEG_0 ;
+Pron+Neg+Sg: PRON-NEG_J ;
+Pron+Neg+Pl:ъяс PRON-NEG_0 ;
+Pron+Neg+Pl:ъяс PRON-NEG_J ;

LEXICON PRON-NEG_0/J
+Pron+Neg+Sg: PRON-NEG_0 ;
+Pron+Neg+Sg:й PRON-NEG_J ;
+Pron+Neg+Pl:ъяс PRON-NEG_0 ;
+Pron+Neg+Pl:ъяс PRON-NEG_J ;

LEXICON PRON-NEG_0
+Nom: WordEnd ;
+Gen:лӧн WordEnd ;
+Abl:лысь K ; !
+Dat:лы WordEnd ;
+Acc+PxSg2:тӧ WordEnd ;
+Acc+PxSg3:сӧ WordEnd ;
+Com:кӧд K ;
+Car:тӧг K ;
+Cns:ла K ;
+Apr:лань K ;
+Egr:сянь K ;
+Tra:ті K ;

LEXICON PRON-NEG_J
+Acc+PxSg1:ӧс WordEnd ;
+Ins:ӧн K ;
+Ine:ын K ;
+Ela:ысь K ; 
+Ill:ӧ K ; !
+Ter:ӧдз K ;




LEXICON PRON-NEG-COLL
+Coll:нан PRON-NEG-COLL-PERS ;
+Coll: PRON-NEG-COLL-PERS ; !+ZeroColl
!
+Coll+Acc2+PxPl2:ныдтӧ K ; !+ZeroColl
+Coll+Acc2+PxPl2:наннытӧ K ;

LEXICON PRON-NEG-COLL-PERS
+PxPl1:ным PRON-NEG-COLL-CASES ;
+PxPl2:ныд PRON-NEG-COLL-CASES ;
+PxPl3:ныс PRON-NEG-COLL-CASES ;
!
+Acc+PxPl1:нымӧс K ;
+Acc2+PxPl2:нытӧ K ;
+Acc3+PxPl3:ныссӧ K ;

LEXICON PRON-NEG-COLL-CASES
+Nom: K ;
 PRON-NEG-OBL ;

LEXICON PRON-NEG-OBL
! 2011-11-15 This is used by PRON-NEG
! also тэа-мэа inclusive 1Du, сыа-мэа exclusive 1Du
+Cmpl: WordEnd ;
+Gen:лӧн WordEnd ;
+Abl:лысь K ; !
+Dat:лы WordEnd ;
+Acc:ӧс WordEnd ;
+Acc3:сӧ WordEnd ;
+Ins:ӧн K ;
+Com:кӧд K ;
+Car:тӧг K ;
+Cns:ла K ;
 PRON-NEG-SPAT ;

LEXICON PRON-NEG-SPAT
+Ine:ын K ;
+Ela:ысь K ; 
+Ill:ӧ K ; !
+Apr:лань K ;
+Egr:сянь K ;
+Tra:ті K ;
+Ter:ӧдз K ;
 
LEXICON PRON-NEG-IS_ILL
+Pron+Neg+Ill: K ;

!! Tagged in the src/morphology/stems/pronouns.xml file
LEXICON PRON_
+Pron: K ;
LEXICON PronInterr
+Pron+Interr: WordEnd ;
!2018-10-21!LEXICON PronIndef
!2018-10-21!+Pron+Indef: WordEnd ;

!! Word-final cases

LEXICON ABL-WORD-END
+Abl:лысь WordEnd ;
LEXICON ACC-WORD-END
+Acc:ӧс WordEnd ;
LEXICON CAR-WORD-END
+Car:тӧг WordEnd ;
LEXICON CNS-WORD-END
+Cns:ла WordEnd ;
LEXICON COM-WORD-END
+Com:кӧд WordEnd ;
LEXICON EGR-WORD-END
+Egr:сянь WordEnd ;
LEXICON ELA-WORD-END
+Ela:ысь WordEnd ;
LEXICON GEN-WORD-END
+Gen:лӧн WordEnd ;
LEXICON ILL-WORD-END
+Ill:ӧ WordEnd ;
LEXICON INE-WORD-END
+Ine:ын WordEnd ;
LEXICON INS-WORD-END
+Ins:ӧн WordEnd ;
LEXICON NOM-WORD-END
+Nom: WordEnd ;
LEXICON PRL-WORD-END
+Prl:ӧд WordEnd ;
LEXICON TER-WORD-END
+Ter:ӧдз WordEnd ;

! vim: set ft=xfst-lexc:
