src/morphology/stems/pronouns.lexc
LEXICON pronouns
быд:быд PRON-QNT_  "joka" ;
быдся:быдся PRON-QNT_  "joka" ;
быдсяма:быдсяма PRON-QNT_  "joka" ;
быдсӧн:быдсӧн PRONQ-COLL  "kaikki" ;
быдсӧн:быдсӧн PRON_  "" ;
быдсӧн:быдсӧн PRON_  "" ;
быдӧн:быдӧн PRONQ-COLL  "jokainen" ;
кыдз-мый:кыдз-мый PRON_  "" ;
кымын:кымын PRON-QNT_  "kuinka monta" ;
кыт:кыт PronInterr  "" ;
кытчань:кытчань PronInterr  "" ;
кытчӧ-мый:кытчӧ-мый PRON_  "" ;
кытысь:кытысь PronInterr  "" ;
кытӧн:кытӧн PronInterr  "" ;
кӧнъя:кӧнъя PronInterr  "" ;
месся:месся PRON_  "" ;
милы:милы PRON_  "" ;
милысь:милысь PRON_  "" ;
морта-морт:морта-морт PRON_  "" ;
мукӧд:мукӧд PRONQ-MUKOD  "muu" ;
мыйла:мыйла PRON-QNT_  "miksi" ;
мыя:мыя PronInterr  "" ;
мӧдар:мӧдар PRON-QNT_  "toinen" ;
мӧдар:мӧдар PRONQ-ATAG  "" ;
нала:нала PRON_  "" ;
наӧн:наӧн PRON_  "" ;
некодар:некодар PRON-NEG  "" ;
некоднан:некод PRON-NEG-COLL  "" ;
некодыр:некодыр PRON-NEG-End  "" ;
некор:некор PRON-NEG-End  "" ;
некутшӧм:некутшӧм PRON-NEG-A  "" ;
некутшӧма:некутшӧма PRON-NEG-ADV  "" ;
некыдз:некыдз PRON-NEG-End  "" ;
некыдзи:некыдзи PRON-NEG-End  "" ;
некымын:некымын PRON-NEG  "" ;
некымынлаын:некымынлаын PRON-NEG-IN_LA  "" ;
некымынысь:некымынысь PRON-NEG-ITER  "" ;
нем:нем PRON-NEG  "ei mitään" ;
немтор:немтор PRON-NEG_0/J  "" ;
неуна:неуна PRON-QNT_  "hieman" ;
нинӧкод:нинӧкод PRON-NEG  "" ;
нинӧкутшӧм:нинӧкутшӧм PRON-NEG-A  "" ;
нинӧм:нинӧм PRON-NEG  "" ;
нинӧмтор:нинӧмтор PRON-NEG_0/J  "" ;
ньӧти:ньӧти PRON-QNT_  "ei lainkaan" ;
став:став PRONQ-STAV  "kaikki" ;
став:став PRONQ-STAV  "kaikki" ;
став:став PRON-QNT_  "" ;
ставсӧ:ставсӧ PRON-QNT_  "" ;
ставыс:ставыс PRON_  "kaikki" ;
ставыс:ставыс PRON-QNT_  "" ;
ставӧн:ставӧн PRON_  "kaikki" ;
ставӧн:ставӧн PRONQ-COLL  "" ;
сыа-мэа:сыа-мэа PRON-DUAL  "" ;
сыла:сыла PRON_  "" ;
сымда:сымда PRON-QNT_  "" ;
сымда-мында:сымда-мында PRON-QNT_  "" ;
сыысь:сыысь PRON_  "" ;
тэа-мэа:тэа-мэа PRON-DUAL  "" ;
тэд:тэд PRON_  "sinulle" ;
тэн:тэн PRON_  "sinulle" ;
унаӧн:унаӧн PRONQ-COLL  "monet" ;
этшаӧн:этшаӧн PRONQ-COLL  "harvat" ;
ӧтар:ӧтар PRONQ-ATAG  "toinen" ;
ӧтар-мӧдар:ӧтар-мӧдар PRONQ-ATAG  "" ;
ӧтмӧдар:ӧтмӧдар PRONQ-ATAG  "" ;
